Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.013

Affidavit of loss.

"Affidavit of loss" means a written statement confirming that the certificate of title, registration certificate, gross weight license, validation tab, or decal has been lost, stolen, destroyed, or mutilated. The statement must be in a form prescribed by the director.

[ 2010 c 161 s 101.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 161: "Except for section 1020 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2011." [ 2010 c 161 s 1238.]

Intent—2010 c 161: "This act is intended to streamline and make technical amendments to certain codified statutes that deal with vehicle and vessel registration and title. Any statutory changes made by this act should be interpreted as technical in nature and not be interpreted to have any substantive policy or legal implications." [ 2010 c 161 s 1.]

Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: "The senate and house of representatives transportation committees, in consultation with the office of the code reviser, shall prepare legislation for the 2011 regular legislative session that reconciles and conforms amendments made during the 2010 legislative session in this act." [ 2010 c 161 s 1201.]